Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2620.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3(5), (8), (9), (10), (13), (14) and (15) of the act of December 27, 1974 (P.L.995, No.326), known as the Veterinary Medicine Practice Act, are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 3. Definitions.--As used in this act:* * *(5) "Current licensee or certificate holder" means the holder of a current license to practice veterinary medicine or the holder of a certificate [of veterinary technician] as a veterinary technician or veterinary nurse, which license or 12345678910111213141516171819202122 certificate was issued under this act and which has not been suspended or revoked and has not expired.* * *(8) "Licensed doctor of veterinary medicine" or "licensed veterinarian" means a person qualified by educational training and experience in the science and techniques of veterinary medicine and who is currentlylicensed by the board to practice veterinary medicine.(9) "Veterinary medicine" means that branch of medicine which deals with the diagnosis, prognosis, treatment, administration, prescription, operation or manipulation or application of any apparatus or appliance for any disease, pain, deformity, defect, injury, wound, physical condition or mental condition requiring medication of any animal or for the prevention of [or the testing for the presence of] any disease.(10) "Practice of veterinary medicine" includes, but is not limited to, the practice by any person who (i) diagnoses, treats, corrects, changes, relieves or prevents animal disease, deformity, defect, injury or other physical, mental or dental conditions by any method or mode, including the prescription or administration of any prescription drug, medicine, biologic, apparatus, application, anesthetic or other therapeutic or diagnostic substance or technique on any animal, (ii) performs a surgical operation, including cosmetic surgery, upon any animal, (iii) performs any manual, mechanical, biological or chemical procedure upon an animal for [the diagnosis or treatment of sterility or infertility of animals] reproductive management, (iv) represents himself as engaged in the practice of veterinary medicine, (v) offers, undertakes, or holds himself out as being able to diagnose, treat, operate, vaccinate, or prescribe for 20260HB2620PN3576 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any animal disease, pain, injury, deformity, or physical condition, (vi) uses any words, letters, or titles in such connection or under such circumstances as to induce the belief that the person using them is engaged in the practice of veterinary medicine and such use shall be prima facie evidence of the intention to represent himself as engaged in the practice of veterinary medicine, (vii) performs diagnostic veterinary pathology, (viii) implants electronic identification, as determined by the board, upon any animal, (ix) renders advice or recommendation by any means, including the electronic transmission of data with regard to any of the above, or (x) removes any embryo from an animal for the purpose of transferring such embryo into another animal or cryopreserving such embryo, except it shall not be considered the practice of veterinary medicine when: (a) a person or his full-time employe removes or transfers an embryo from the person's own animals for the purpose of transferring or cryopreserving the embryo so long as ownership of the animal is not transferred or employment of the person is not changed for the purpose of circumventing this act or (b) a person independently, with indirect veterinary supervision, implants any embryo into an animal.* * *(13) "Certified veterinary technician" or "certified veterinary nurse" means an individual who has successfully completed a board-approved post-high school program of veterinary technology accredited by an accrediting agency for veterinary technology programs recognized by the United States Department of Education, is certified by the board as a veterinary technician or veterinary nurse and [who may] practice veterinary technology under appropriate supervision of a 20260HB2620PN3576 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licensed veterinarian as defined by board regulation or under section 11.1. Unless authorized to practice veterinary technology under this act, an individual may not practice veterinary technology nor use the title "certified veterinary technician" or the abbreviation ["CVT."] "CVT" or use the title "certified veterinary nurse" or the abbreviation "CVN."(14) "Veterinary assistant" means an employe of a licensed veterinarian who does not hold certification as a veterinary technician or veterinary nurse and whom the licensed veterinarian deems competent to perform tasks involved in the care and treatment of animals as defined by board regulation.(15) "Veterinarian-client-patient relationship" means a relationship satisfying all of the following conditions: (i) the veterinarian has assumed the responsibility for making veterinary medical judgments regarding the health of an animal and the need for veterinary medical treatment, and the client, owner or caretaker of the animal has agreed to follow the instructions of the veterinarian; (ii) the veterinarian has sufficient knowledge of the animal to initiate at least a general, preliminary or tentative diagnosis of the medical condition of the animal; (iii) the veterinarian is acquainted with the keeping and care of the animal by virtue of [an] at least one on-site physical examination of the animal or has made medically appropriate and timely on-site physical visits to the premises where the animal is kept; (iv) the veterinarian is available for consultation in cases of adverse reactions to or failure of the regimen of therapy; (v) the veterinarian maintains records on the animal examined in accordance with regulations established by the board.(16) "Client" means a person who engages the professional 20260HB2620PN3576 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 services of a licensed veterinarian.(17) "Direct veterinary supervision" means supervision by a licensed veterinarian who is in the immediate vicinity and able to advise or physically intervene in each procedure.(18) "Indirect veterinary supervision" means supervision by a licensed veterinarian who is not physically present but has given written or oral instructions to a certified veterinary technician, certified veterinary nurse or veterinary assistant and is readily available for communication in person or through electronic information and communication technology.(19) "Large animal" means a domesticated bovine, equine, ovine, porcine, caprine, cervid or avian animal.(20) "Schedule II controlled substance" means a controlled substance listed in section 4(2) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as "The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act."Section 2. Sections 4(a)(4) and 11 of the act are amended to read:Section 4. Pennsylvania State Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners.--(a) There is hereby established within the Department of State the State Board of Veterinary Medicine. The board shall consist of nine members, as follows:* * *(4) One member, appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of a majority of the members elected to the Senate, who is certified as a veterinary technician or veterinary nurse in accordance with this act.* * *Section 11. Additional Duties of Board of Examiners; Veterinary Technicians and Veterinary Nurses.--It shall further 20260HB2620PN3576 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be the responsibility of the board to promulgate by regulation the qualifications and requirements for the certification and regulation of veterinary technicians and veterinary nurses. Such regulations shall provide for disciplinary action and shall prescribe the grounds for such action. The board shall have authority to establish reasonable fees for certification as hereinafter provided in this act.Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 11.1. Scope of Practice for Veterinary Technicians and Veterinary Nurses.--(a) Notwithstanding section 11 or a regulation promulgated under section 11, a certified veterinary technician or certified veterinary nurse may, under indirect veterinary supervision, perform a manual, mechanical, biological or chemical procedure for reproductive management of a large animal if all of the following apply:(1) The licensed veterinarian providing indirect veterinary supervision has an established veterinarian-client-patient relationship with the client responsible for the care of the large animal.(2) The licensed veterinarian providing indirect veterinary supervision has determined that the certified veterinary technician or certified veterinary nurse is competent to perform the procedure.(3) The licensed veterinarian providing indirect veterinary supervision retains control and authority over the care of the large animal during the procedure.(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a certified veterinary technician or certified veterinary nurse to diagnose a condition of infertility or administer a Schedule II controlled substance.20260HB2620PN3576 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. Sections 18, 27.1, 28(b) and (c) and 32 introductory paragraph and (1), (2), (6) and (7) of the act are amended to read:Section 18. Biennial Educational Requirements.--Each holder of a license to practice veterinary medicine under this act shall be required to complete thirty clock hours of educational programs in the twenty-four months preceding each renewal date, and each holder of a certificate to practice veterinary technology as a certified veterinary technician or certified veterinary nurse under this act shall be required to complete sixteen clock hours of educational programs in the twenty-four months preceding each renewal date. Certification of such completion shall be in accordance with regulations of the board. All such educational programs shall be first approved by the board and shall meet the standards promulgated by the board to ensure that the programs meet the educational and professional requirements of the profession and are designed to keep the members of the profession abreast with current learning and scholarship. No credit shall be given for any course in office management or practice building.Section 27.1. Records; Inspection of Records.--(a) A licensed veterinarian subject to the provisions of this section shall, as required by regulation of the board, keep or cause to be kept a written record of all animals or groups of animals, as the case may be, receiving veterinary services and provide a summary or copy of that record to the owner of the animals when requested. The minimum amount of information which shall be included in written or electronically maintained records and summaries and the minimum duration of time for which a licensed veterinarian shall retain the records or a complete copy of the 20260HB2620PN3576 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 records shall be established by the board.(b) (1) Copies of all records required to be kept by a licensed veterinarian under this section, including, but not limited to, records pertaining to diagnosis and treatment of animals and records pertaining to drugs or devices for use on animals, shall be provided to the board immediately upon request. The records shall also be open to inspection by the board or its authorized representatives during an inspection as part of an inspection program adopted by the board or during an investigation initiated in response to a complaint that a licensee has violated any law or regulation that constitutes grounds for disciplinary action by the board.(2) Equipment and drugs on the premises or any other place where veterinary medicine, dentistry or surgery is being practiced, or otherwise in the possession of a licensed veterinarian for purposes of the practice of veterinary medicine, shall be open to inspection by the board or its authorized representatives during an inspection as part of an inspection program adopted by the board or during an investigation initiated in response to a complaint that a licensee has violated any law or regulation which constitutes grounds for disciplinary action by the board.Section 28. Penalties.--* * *(b) Any person who engages in the practice of veterinary medicine without the license required by this act or who [performs the duties of an animal health technician] practices veterinary technology as a certified veterinary technician or certified veterinary nurse without the certificate required by this act commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall, upon conviction, for a first offense, be sentenced to a fine not 20260HB2620PN3576 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or to imprisonment for not more than six months or both. A second offense shall be subject to a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) or imprisonment for a term of six months to one year or both.(c) In addition to any other civil remedy or criminal penalty provided for in this act, the board, by a vote of the majority of the maximum number of the authorized membership of the board as provided by law or by a vote of the majority of the duly qualified and confirmed membership or a minimum of four members, whichever is greater, may levy a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) on any current licensee or certificate holder who violates any provision of this act or on any person who practices veterinary medicine or [performs the duties of an animal health technician] practices veterinary technology as a certified veterinary technician or certified veterinary nurse without being properly licensed or certified to do so under this act. The board shall levy this penalty only after affording the accused party the opportunity for a hearing, as provided in Title 2 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes (relating to administrative law and procedure).* * *Section 32. Exemptions and Exceptions.--This act shall not apply to any of the following:(1) Students in schools or colleges of veterinary medicine and programs of veterinary technology approved by the board pursuant to section 8 in the performance of duties or actions assigned by their instructors or when working under the [immediate] direct veterinary supervision of a licensee.(2) [Licensed veterinarians in good standing with their respective states who are called from their states, provinces of 20260HB2620PN3576 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Canada or United States territories] A veterinarian who holds a license from another state, a province of Canada or a United States territory, is in good standing with the licensing jurisdiction and is called from that jurisdiction to consult with licensees of this State, but who: (i) [do] does not open an office or appoint a place to do business within this State; (ii) [do] does not print or use letterhead or business cards reflecting addresses in this State; (iii) [do] does not establish answering services or advertise the existence of a practice's address within this State; (iv) [do] does not practice veterinary medicine as [consultants] a consultant rendering services directly to the public without the direction and consultation of licensees of this State more than 16 days per calendar year; or (v) [are] is providing services for [organizations conducting public events] an organization conducting a public event lasting less than ten days that [utilize] utilizes animals in need of veterinary examinations, treatments or oversight to promote the safety and health of the public, the event or the animal participants.* * *(6) Any [nurse,] laboratory technician or other employe of a licensed doctor of veterinary medicine when administering medication or rendering auxiliary or supporting assistance under the responsible supervision of such licensed [practitioner] veterinarian, provided that this exemption shall not apply to the performance of duties by any employe other than a [nurse or] laboratory technician if those duties require an understanding of animal science and provided further that this exemption shall not apply to any graduate of a board-approved school or college of veterinary medicine or to any graduate of a board-approved 20260HB2620PN3576 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program of [animal health] veterinary technology.(7) Any person performing normal husbandry practices on [bovine, porcine, caprine, ovine or equine animals or avis] a bovine, porcine, caprine, ovine, cervid, equine or avian animal.* * *Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2620PN3576 - 11 - 123456